Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB1213.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2303XC (1) 91 ll/ns S.F. _____ Section 1. Section 123.137, subsection 1, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 1. a. A Except as provided in paragraph âbâ , a person 3 holding a class âAâ or special class âAâ beer permit shall, 4 on or before the tenth day of each calendar month commencing 5 on the tenth day of the calendar month following the month 6 in which the person is issued a beer permit, make a report 7 under oath to the department electronically, or in a manner 8 prescribed by the director, showing the exact number of barrels 9 of beer, or fractional parts of barrels, sold by the beer 10 permit holder during the preceding calendar month. The report 11 shall also state information the director requires, and beer 12 permit holders shall at the time of filing a report pay to the 13 department the amount of tax due at the rate fixed in section 14 123.136 . 15 b. A class âAâ or special class âAâ beer permit holder who 16 reasonably expects to be liable for not more than two thousand 17 five hundred dollars in barrel tax for the twelve-month period 18 beginning July 1 and ending June 30, and who was liable for not 19 more than two thousand five hundred dollars in barrel tax in 20 the immediately preceding twelve-month period beginning July 21 1 and ending June 30, may file reports and pay taxes due as 22 described in paragraph âaâ on a quarterly basis according to the 23 following schedule: 24 (1) On or before October 10 for the months of July, August, 25 and September. 26 (2) On or before January 10 for the months of October, 27 November, and December. 28 (3) On or before April 10 for the months of January, 29 February, and March. 30 (4) On or before July 10 for the months of April, May, and 31 June. 32 Sec. 2. Section 123.184, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 33 to read as follows: 34 1. a. Each Except as provided in paragraph âbâ , a class 35 -1- LSB 2303XC (1) 91 ll/ns 1/ 4 S.F. _____ âAâ wine permit holder on or before the tenth day of each 1 calendar month commencing on the tenth day of the calendar 2 month following the month in which the person is issued a 3 permit, shall make a report under oath to the department 4 electronically, or in a manner prescribed by the director, 5 showing the exact number of gallons of wine and fractional 6 parts of gallons sold by that permit holder during the 7 preceding calendar month. The report also shall state whatever 8 reasonable additional information the director requires. The 9 permit holder at the time of filing this report shall pay to 10 the department the amount of tax due at the rate fixed in 11 section 123.183 . 12 b. A class âAâ wine permit holder who reasonably expects to 13 be liable for not more than two thousand five hundred dollars 14 in wine gallonage tax for the twelve-month period beginning 15 July 1 and ending June 30, and who was liable for not more than 16 two thousand five hundred dollars in wine gallonage tax in the 17 immediately preceding twelve-month period beginning July 1 and 18 ending June 30, may file reports and pay taxes as described in 19 paragraph âaâ on a quarterly basis according to the following 20 schedule: 21 (1) On or before October 10 for the months of July, August, 22 and September. 23 (2) On or before January 10 for the months of October, 24 November, and December. 25 (3) On or before April 10 for the months of January, 26 February, and March. 27 (4) On or before July 10 for the months of April, May, and 28 June. 29 c. A penalty of ten percent of the amount of the tax shall 30 be assessed and collected if the report required to be filed 31 pursuant to this subsection is not filed and the tax paid 32 within the time required by this subsection . 33 Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act takes effect January 1, 34 2026. 35 -2- LSB 2303XC (1) 91 ll/ns 2/ 4 S.F. _____